Utah statutes.
62A-4a-802.    Safe relinquishment of a newborn child.
(1) (a)  A parent or a parent's designee may safely relinquish a newborn child
at a hospital in accordance with the provisions of this part and retain
complete anonymity, so long as the child has not been subject to abuse or
neglect.
(b)  Safe relinquishment of a newborn child who has not otherwise been subject
to abuse or neglect shall not, in and of itself, constitute neglect as defined
in Section 78A-6-105, and the child shall not be considered a neglected child,
as defined in Section 78A-6-105, so long as the relinquishment is carried out
in substantial compliance with the provisions of this part.
(2) (a)  Personnel employed by a hospital shall accept a newborn child that is
relinquished pursuant to the provisions of this part, and may presume that the
person relinquishing is the child's parent or the parent's designee.
(b)  The person receiving the newborn child may request information regarding
the parent and newborn child's medical histories, and identifying information
regarding the nonrelinquishing parent of the child.
(c)  The division shall provide hospitals with medical history forms and
stamped envelopes addressed to the division that a hospital may provide to a
person relinquishing a child pursuant to the provisions of this part.
(d)  Personnel employed by a hospital shall:
(i)  provide any necessary medical care to the child and notify the division
as soon as possible, but no later than 24 hours after receipt of the child;
and
(ii)  prepare a birth certificate or foundling birth certificate if parentage
is unknown and file with the Office of Vital Records and Statistics.
(e)  A hospital and personnel employed by a hospital are immune from any civil
or criminal liability arising from accepting a newborn child if the personnel
employed by the hospital substantially comply with the provisions of this part
and medical treatment is administered according to standard medical practice.
(3)  The division shall assume care and custody of the child immediately upon
notice from the hospital.
(4)  So long as the division determines there is no abuse or neglect of the
newborn child, neither the newborn child nor the child's parents are subject
to:
(a)  the provisions of Part 2 of this chapter, Child Welfare Services;
(b)  the investigation provisions contained in Section 62A-4a-409; or
(c)  the provisions of Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and
Dependency Proceedings.
(5)  Unless identifying information relating to the nonrelinquishing parent of
the newborn child has been provided:
(a)  the division shall work with local law enforcement and the Bureau of
Criminal Identification within the Department of Public Safety in an effort to
ensure that the newborn child has not been identified as a missing child;
(b)  the division shall immediately place or contract for placement of the
newborn child in a potential adoptive home and, within 10 days after receipt
of the child, file a petition for termination of parental rights in accordance
with Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 5, Termination of Parental Rights Act;
(c)  the division shall direct the Office of Vital Records and Statistics to
conduct a search for a birth certificate for the child and an Initiation of
Proceedings to Establish Paternity Registry for unmarried biological fathers
maintained by the Office of Vital Records and Statistics within the Department
of Health and provide notice to each potential father identified on the
registry.  Notice of termination of parental rights proceedings shall be
provided in the same manner as is utilized for any other termination
proceeding in which the identity of the child's parents is unknown;
(d)  if no person has affirmatively identified himself or herself within two
weeks after notice is complete and established paternity by scientific testing
within as expeditious a time frame as practicable, a hearing on the petition
for termination of parental rights shall be scheduled; and
(e)  if a nonrelinquishing parent is not identified, relinquishment of a
newborn child pursuant to the provisions of this part shall be considered
grounds for termination of parental rights of both the relinquishing and
nonrelinquishing parents under Section 78A-6-507.
(6)  If at any time prior to the adoption, a court finds it is in the best
interest of the child, the court shall deny the petition for termination of
parental rights.
(7)  The division shall provide for, or contract with a licensed child-placing
agency to provide for expeditious adoption of the newborn child.
(8)  So long as the person relinquishing a newborn child is the child's parent
or designee, and there is no abuse or neglect, safe relinquishment of a
newborn child in substantial compliance with the provisions of this part is an
affirmative defense to any potential criminal liability for abandonment or
neglect relating to that relinquishment.
